Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4014
Person committed to Department of Correctional Services; attend sex offender treatment and counseling programming.

Any person convicted of a crime requiring registration as a sex offender pursuant to section 29-4003 and committed to the Department of Correctional Services shall attend appropriate sex offender treatment and counseling programming offered by the department. Refusal to participate in such programming shall not result in disciplinary action or a loss of good time credit on the part of the offender but shall require a civil commitment evaluation pursuant to section 83-174.02 prior to the completion of his or her criminal sentence.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 26.

This section does not violate the constitutional provisions relating to equal protection, special legislation, separation of powers, bills of attainder, ex post facto, or double jeopardy. In re Interest of A.M., 281 Neb. 482, 797 N.W.2d 233 (2011).